Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1767XS (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 135 Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. In lieu of issuing new registration plates each 3 registration year for a vehicle renewing registration, the 4 department may reassign the registration plates previously 5 issued to the vehicle and may adopt and prescribe an annual 6 validation sticker indicating payment of annual registration 7 fees. The department shall issue one validation sticker for 8 each set of registration plates. The sticker shall must 9 specify the month and year of expiration of the registration 10 plates. The sticker shall be displayed only on the rear 11 registration plate, except that the sticker shall be displayed 12 on the front registration plate of a truck tractor. A 13 validation sticker issued for the upcoming registration year 14 prior to the expiration of the applicable current registration 15 year does not invalidate the registration, and is not required 16 to be displayed on the registered vehicleâs registration plate 17 until the owner would be considered to be driving a motor 18 vehicle with an expired registration under section 321.39. 19